Nevada, session 83, AB18.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 62D.400 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62D.400 1. A clerk of the court may allow any of the
following documents to be filed electronically:
(a) A petition prepared and signed by the district attorney
pursuant to NRS 62C.100 or 62C.110.
(b) A document relating to proceedings conducted pursuant to
this title.
(c) A study and report prepared pursuant to NRS 62E.160.
2. Any document that is filed electronically pursuant to this
section must contain [an image of] the electronic signature of the
person who is filing the document.
3. As used in this section, “electronic signature” has the
meaning ascribed to it in the Nevada Electronic Filing and
Conversion Rules.
Sec. 2. NRS 171.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
171.103 1. A court clerk may accept a complaint filed
pursuant to this chapter that is filed electronically. A complaint that
is filed electronically must contain [an image of] the electronic
signature of the prosecuting attorney.
2. If a court clerk accepts a complaint that is filed
electronically pursuant to subsection 1, the court clerk shall
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
acknowledge receipt of the complaint by an electronic time stamp
and shall electronically return the complaint with the electronic time
stamp to the prosecuting attorney. A complaint that is filed and
time-stamped electronically pursuant to this section may be
converted into a printed document and served upon a defendant in
the same manner as a complaint that is not filed electronically.
3. As used in this section, “electronic signature” has the
meaning ascribed to it in the Nevada Electronic Filing and
Conversion Rules.
Sec. 3. NRS 173.049 is hereby amended to read as follows:
173.049 1. A court clerk may accept an information filed
pursuant to this chapter that is filed electronically. An information
that is filed electronically must contain [an image of] the electronic
signature of the prosecuting attorney.
2. If a court clerk accepts an information that is filed
electronically pursuant to subsection 1, the court clerk shall
acknowledge receipt of the information by an electronic time stamp
and shall electronically return the information with the electronic
time stamp to the prosecuting attorney. An information that is filed
and time-stamped electronically pursuant to this section may be
converted into a printed document and served upon a defendant in
the same manner as an information that is not filed electronically.
3. As used in this section, “electronic signature” has the
meaning ascribed to it in the Nevada Electronic Filing and
Conversion Rules.
Sec. 4. NRS 178.591 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.591 1. Except when personal service of a person is
ordered by the court or required by specific statute, a person who is
represented by an attorney may be lawfully served with any motion,
notice or other legal document by electronic means if the office of
the attorney representing the person has the ability to receive and
store the motion, notice or other legal document electronically.
2. In addition to any other document required by the court, a
person who uses electronic means pursuant to subsection 1 to
electronically serve any motion, notice or other legal document that
is required to be filed with the court shall include with the original
document filed with the court evidence of the electronic transmittal
of the legal document.
3. A court clerk may accept a motion, notice or other legal
document that is filed electronically. A motion, notice or other legal
document that is filed electronically must contain [an image of] the
electronic signature of the prosecuting attorney.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
4. If a court clerk accepts a motion, notice or other legal
document that is filed electronically pursuant to subsection 3, the
court clerk shall acknowledge receipt of the motion, notice or other
legal document by an electronic time stamp and shall electronically
return the motion, notice or other legal document with the electronic
time stamp to the prosecuting attorney. A motion, notice or other
legal document may be converted into a printed document and
served upon a defendant in the same manner as a motion, notice or
other legal document that is not filed electronically.
5. A motion, notice or other legal document that is filed or
served electronically shall be deemed to be filed or served on the
date that it is filed or served electronically if it is filed or served not
later than 11:59 p.m. on that date.
6. As used in this section, “electronic signature” has the
meaning ascribed to it in the Nevada Electronic Filing and
Conversion Rules.
Sec. 5. NRS 432B.515 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.515 1. A court clerk may allow any of the following
documents to be filed electronically:
(a) A petition signed by the district attorney or the Attorney
General pursuant to NRS 432B.510; or
(b) A report prepared pursuant to NRS 432B.540.
2. Any document that is filed electronically pursuant to this
section must contain [an image of] the electronic signature of the
person who is filing the document.
3. As used in this section, “electronic signature” has the
meaning ascribed to it in the Nevada Electronic Filing and
Conversion Rules.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)